Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-541
Sections, how construed.

Sections 25-535 to 25-541 do not repeal or modify any other law of this state permitting another procedure for service.

Laws 1967, c. 143, § 7, p. 440.